en: white hibiscus
fr: hibiscus blanc

en: chinese hibiscus, china rose, hawaiian hibiscus, rose mallow, shoeblackplant, hibiscus rosa-sinensis
ar: خطمي وردي صيني
az: çin hibiskusu
be: кітайская ружа
bg: китайска роза
bn: জবা
cs: ibišek čínský
de: chinesischer roseneibisch
es: hibiscus rosa-sinensis
et: rooshibisk
fa: ختمی چینی
fi: kiinanruusu
fr: hibiscus rose de chine
hr: kineski hibiskus
ht: choublak
hu: kínai hibiszkusz
hy: չինական վարդ
id: kembang sepatu
it: hibiscus rosa-sinensis
ja: ブッソウゲ
jv: kembang sepatu
ko: 부상화
lt: tikroji kinrožė
ml: ചെമ്പരത്തി
mr: जास्वंद
ms: bunga raya
ne: जिभ्रे फूल
nl: chinese roos
or: ମନ୍ଦାର
pl: ketmia róża chińska
pt: hibiscus rosa-sinensis
ro: hibiscus rosa-sinensis
ru: гибискус китайский
sa: जपापुष्पम्
sd: عجائب گھر
si: බදුවද
sk: ibištek čínsky
sv: hibiskus
ta: செம்பருத்தி
te: మందార
th: ชบา
to: kaute
tr: japon gülü
uk: гібіскус китайський
vi: dâm bụt
zh: 朱槿

en: safflower, carthamus
am: ሱፍ
ar: عصفر
be: Сафлор
bg: шафранка
bn: কুসুম ফুল
bo: གུར་ཀུམ།
ca: càrtam
cs: Saflor, světlice barvířská
cy: Safflwr
de: Safflor, Färberdistel, Saflor
es: Cártamo
et: Värvisafloor
eu: Kartamo
fa: گلرنگ
fi: saflori, värisaflori, väriohdake, väriohdaketta, safflori
fr: carthame
ga: Cróch bréige
gl: Cártamo
he: חריע
hi: कुसुम
hr: šafranika
hu: Sáfrányos szeklice
id: Kesumba
io: Kartamo
it: cartamo
ja: ベニバナ
ka: ალისარჩული
kk: Мақсыр
kn: ಕುಸುಬಿ
ko: 잇꽃
la: Carthamus tinctorius
lt: Dažinis dygminas
ml: ചെണ്ടൂരകം
mr: करडई
ms: Kesumba
nb: Safrantistel
ne: कुसुम
nl: saffloer
or: କୁସୁମ
pa: ਕਸੁੰਭ
pl: Kartamus, krokosz, krokosza, krokosz barwierski, krokosz barwiarski, kartamusa, krokosza barwierskiego
ps: ځريځه
pt: Cártamo
ru: Сафлор
sd: کھنبو
sh: Šafranika
sr: Шафраника
sv: Safflor, färgtistel
te: కుసుమ
th: คำฝอย
tr: Aspir
ur: گلرنگ
vi: Hồng hoa
zh: 红花

en: safflower flower
de: Saflorblüte
fi: saflorinkukka
fr: fleur de carthame
hr: cvijet šafranike
it: fiore di cartamo
pl: kwiat krokosza barwierskiego, kwiatu krokosza barwierskiego

en: safflower concentrate, carthamus concentrate
de: Saflorkonzentrat, Saflorextrakt, färbendes Saflorkonzentrat
es: concentrado de cártamo
fi: safloritiiviste, safloriuute, saffloritiiviste
fr: extrait de carthame, concentré de carthame
hr: koncentrat šafranike
it: concentrato di cartamo
nl: saffloerconcentraat
pl: koncentrat z krokosza barwierskiego, koncentrat krokosza barwierskiego
sv: safflor koncentrat

en: sunflower
af: sonneblom
ar: دوار الشمس
az: günəbaxan
ba: көнбағыш
be: Сланечнік
bg: слънчоглед, слънчогледова, слънчогледово
bs: suncokretovo
ca: Gira-sol
cs: slunečnice
cv: Хĕвелçаврăнăш ретĕнчисем
da: Solsikke
de: Sonnenblumen, Sonnenblume
el: ηλίανθος
eo: helianto
es: girasol
et: päevalill
eu: Helianthus
fa: گل‌آفتاب‌گردانیان
fi: auringonkukka
fr: tournesol
he: חמנית
hr: suncokret, suncokreta, suncokretov, suncokretova, suncokretovo, iz suncokreta
hu: napraforgó
hy: արևածաղիկ
is: Sólblóm
it: girasole
ja: ヒマワリ属
ka: მზესუმზირა
kk: күнбағыс
kn: ಸೂರ್ಯಕಾಂತಿ
ky: Күн карама
la: Helianthus
lt: saulėgrąža
lv: saulespuķes
mk: сончоглед
ml: സൂര്യഗായത്രി
mr: सुर्यफूल
nb: Solsikke
nl: zonnebloem
pl: słonecznik, słonecznika, słonecznikowy, słonecznikowe, słonecznikowa, słonecznikowego
pt: Girassol
ro: floarea soarelui
ru: подсолнечник
si: සූරියකාන්ත
sl: slnečnica
sv: solros
tl: mirasol
to: siolaʻā
tt: көнбагыш
uk: соняшник
uz: kungaboqar
vi: chi Hướng dương
zh: 向日葵屬

en: sprouted sunflower seeds
it: semi di girasole germogliati
pl: kiełki słonecznika

en: soapwort, Saponaria officinalis, Saponaria
de: Seifenkraut, Echtes Seifenkraut
fi: suopayrtti
fr: saponaire
hr: sapunike
it: Saponaria
nl: zeekruid
pl: Mydlnica lekarska, korzeń mydlnicy

en: soapwort extract, Saponaria extract
de: Seifenkrautextrakt
fi: suopayrttiuute
fr: Extrait de saponaire
hr: ekstrakt sapunice
it: Estratto di Saponaria
pl: ekstrakt z mydlnicy lekarskiej, ekstrakt z korzenia mydlnicy

en: Infusion brewed without sugar
fr: Tisane infusée non sucrée
it: infuso preparato senza zucchero

en: tea
af: tee
an: té
ar: شاي
as: চাহ
ay: Pulu
az: çay
ba: сәй
be: чай
bg: чай
bn: চা
bo: ཇ།
br: te
bs: čaj
ca: te
ce: Чай
cs: čaj
cv: чей
cy: te
da: te
de: Tee
dv: ސައި
dz: ཇ
el: τσάι
eo: teo
es: té
et: tee
eu: Te
fa: چای
fi: tee
fo: te
fr: thé
fy: tee
ga: tae
gd: tì
gl: Té
gu: ચા
ha: Shayi
he: תה
hi: चाय
hr: čaj, čaja, camellia sinensis, camellia sinensis list
ht: Te
hu: tea
hy: թեյ
ia: the
id: teh
ie: té
io: teo
is: te
it: tè
iu: ᓂᐅᖅᑲᖅ/ᑏᕐᓗ
ja: 茶
jv: tèh
ka: ჩაი
kk: Шай
km: چائ
kn: ಚಹಾ
ko: 차
ku: çay
ky: Чай
la: thea
lb: Téi
li: tieë
lo: ຊາ
lt: arbata
lv: tēja
mk: чај
ml: ചായ
mn: цай
mr: चहा
ms: teh
my: လက်ဖက်
nb: te
ne: चिया
nl: thee
nn: te
nv: Chʼil ahwééh
oc: Tè
or: ଚା’
os: Цай
pa: ਚਾਹ
pl: Herbata, herbaty
ps: چای
pt: chá
qu: tiy
ro: ceai
ru: чай
sa: चायम्
sd: چانهه
sh: čaj
si: තේ
sk: čaj
sl: čaj
so: shaax
sq: çaji
sr: чај
su: entéh
sv: te
sw: chai
ta: தேநீர்
te: తేనీరు
tg: чой
th: ชา
tk: Çaý
tr: çay
tt: чәй
tv: Шай
ug: چاي
uk: чай
ur: چائے
uz: choy
vi: trà
vo: Tii
wa: té
yi: טיי
zh: 茶
zu: Itiye

en: tea leaf, tea leaves
de: Teeblatt, Teeblätter
it: foglia di tè

en: tea from Ceylon
de: Tee aus Ceylon
fr: the de ceylan
hr: čaj iz cejlona
it: tè di Ceylon

en: tea extract
bg: екстракт от чай
ca: extracte de te, extracte de te Chai
da: te-ekstrakt
de: Tee-Extrakt
es: Extracto de té, extracto de té Chai
fi: teeuute
fr: extrait de thé, extraits de thé
hr: ekstrakt čaja
it: estratto di tè, estratto di foglie di tè
nl: theeextract, thee-extract
sr: ekstrakt čaja
sv: te-extrakt

en: Brewed oolong tea without sugar
fr: Thé oolong infusé non sucré
it: tè oolong preparato senza zucchero

en: black tea
af: swart tee
ar: شاي أحمر
az: qara çay
ba: Ҡара сәй
be: Чорны чай
bg: черен чай
bn: কালো চা
bo: ཇ་དམར།
ca: te negre
cs: černý čaj
da: sort te
de: Schwarztee, Schwarzer Tee, Aufguss aus Schwarztee, Gebrühter Schwarztee, Aufguss aus Schwarzem Tee
el: μαύρο τσάι
eo: nigra teo
es: té negro
eu: Te beltz
fa: چای سیاه
fi: musta tee
fr: thé noir
gl: Té negro
gu: કાળી ચા
he: תה שחור
hr: crni čaj
hy: Սև թեյ
id: teh hitam
it: Tè nero
ja: 紅茶
jv: tèh ireng
ko: 홍차
lo: ຊາດຳ
lt: juodoji arbata
mk: Црн чај
ml: കട്ടൻ ചായ
nb: svart te
nl: zwarte thee
nn: svart te
oc: Tè negre
pa: ਬਲੈਕ ਟੀ
pl: Czarna herbata, herbata czarna
pt: chá preto
ro: ceai negru
ru: чёрный чай, чай черный
sl: črni čaj
sr: црни чај
sv: svart te
th: ชาดำ
tr: Siyah çay
uk: Чорний чай
vi: trà đen
zh: 红茶

en: black tea leaf, black tea leaves
fr: feuilles de thé noir
it: foglia di tè nero

en: black tea mix
it: miscela di tè nero
pl: mieszanka herbat czarnych

en: Ceylon black tea
de: Ceylon Schwarztee
fi: ceylonin musta tee
fr: thé noir du Sri Lanka, thé noir Ceylan, Thé noir de Ceylan
hr: cejlonski crni čaj
it: tè nero di Ceylon

en: organic Ceylon black tea
fi: luomu ceylonin musta tee
fr: Thé noir de Ceylan bio
hr: organski cejlonski crni čaj
it: tè nero Ceylon biologico